Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1861YH (4) 91 sc/ns H.F. 44 Section 1. Section 10A.519, subsection 4, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) At a permanent building that meets the requirements of 3 paragraph âaâ , between June 1 and July 8 and between December 10 4 and January 3 each year, all dates inclusive . 5 Sec. 2. Section 727.2, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 4. Limitations. 8 a. A person shall not use or explode consumer fireworks on 9 days other than June 1 through July 8 , the general election 10 on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of 11 even-numbered years, and December 10 through January 3 of each 12 year, all dates inclusive. 13 b. A person shall not use or explode consumer fireworks at 14 times other than between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m., 15 except that on the following dates consumer fireworks shall not 16 be used at times other than between the hours specified: 17 (1) Between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. on July 18 4 and the Saturdays and Sundays immediately preceding and 19 following July 4. 20 (2) Between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. on the 21 date of the general election on the first Tuesday after the 22 first Monday in November of even-numbered years. 23 (2) (3) Between the hours of 9:00 a.m. on December 31 and 24 12:30 a.m. on the immediately following day. 25 (3) (4) Between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m. on 26 the Saturdays and Sundays immediately preceding and following 27 December 31. 28 c. A person shall not use consumer fireworks on real 29 property other than that personâs real property or on the real 30 property of a person who has consented to the use of consumer 31 fireworks on that property. 32 d. A person who violates this subsection commits a simple 33 misdemeanor. A court shall not order imprisonment for 34 violation of this subsection . 35 -1- LSB 1861YH (4) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 44